tests/commonwords.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../che.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../che.automorf.hfst
Tests:

    а%<conj%>: а ! "and" 265

    т%<unk%>: т ! 64

    у%<unk%>: y ! 60

    Дала%<np%>: Дала ! "God" 46

    х%<unk%>: х !37

    ала%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<rem%>%<wit%>: элира ! "said" 25

    Веза%<unk%>: Веза !22

    д%<unk%>: д !21

    Т%<unk%>: Т !20

    аккха%<unk%>: аккха !20

    е%<unk%>: е ! 18

    ехь%<unk%>: ехь !18

    ера%<unk%>: ера !18

    латта%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>: лаьтта ! "grow, support" 15

    масса%<n%>%<cl_j2%>%<erg%>%<sg%>: массо ! "living creature" 15

    ду%<unk%>: ду !15

    иза%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<abs%>%<sg%>: иза ! "he/she/it" 13

    к%<unk%>: к !12

    и%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dst%>: и ! "that" 12

    тайпан%<n%>%<cl_d%>%<dat%>%<sg%>: тайпана ! "sort, kind" 12


!21-2-2019
!Coverage: 1.59%
!Coverage: 15.73% after adding а
!Coverage: 17.03% after adding элира
!Coverage: 18.23% after adding лаьтта
!Coverage: 20.45% after adding Дала
!Coverage: 21.27% after adding массо
!Coverage: 24.17% adding others
